Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 1 CORRECTIONS ADMINISTRATION
17-1-105. Powers of executive director.

The executive director shall have and exercise:

All the right and power to transfer an inmate between correctional facilities.

Repealed.

The authority to enter into contracts and agreements with other jurisdictions, including other states, the federal government, and political subdivisions of this state, for the confinement and maintenance in state correctional facilities of inmates sentenced to imprisonment by the courts of such other jurisdictions. The executive director shall notify the appropriate authorities of other jurisdictions, as the executive director deems appropriate, of the availability of space in state correctional facilities for the confinement and maintenance of inmates from other jurisdictions.

The authority to lease real property and personal property of the department and any interest therein pursuant to law;

The authority to enter into contracts with any county for the placement of inmates pursuant to section 16-11-308.5, C.R.S.;

The authority to enter into contracts and agreements with other jurisdictions, including other states, the federal government, and political subdivisions of this state, for the confinement and maintenance of offenders sentenced to imprisonment by the courts of this state and the authority to reimburse such jurisdictions for the expenses incurred by such jurisdictions in the confinement and maintenance of said offenders;

The authority to issue administrative warrants, solely for the purpose of returning to a correctional facility, jail, or community corrections center, offenders who have escaped from the custody and care of the department, community corrections, the parole board, or the division of adult parole, containing notice to appropriate law enforcement agencies that there is probable cause to believe that an offender has escaped from custody;

The authority to enter into written agreements with any local, state, regional, or federal law enforcement agency operating within the state to allow such agencies and the department to provide personnel or operational support to one another, if deemed available by the executive director, in support of emergency law enforcement operations in Colorado;

The authority to enter into written agreements with any local, state, regional, or federal law enforcement agency operating within the state to permit department personnel to assist in apprehending offenders who have escaped from the custody of the department.

(1.5) The executive director shall have such other powers and functions as are prescribed for heads of principal departments in the "Administrative Organization Act of 1968", article 1 of title 24, C.R.S.

The executive director shall, subject to approval by the capital development committee and subject to annual appropriation, be authorized to enter into agreements under which the state may acquire title to correctional facilities developed and constructed with private funds upon payment of the stipulated aggregate annual payments within a period of time not to exceed thirty years. The executive director shall also consider all costs associated with the agreement, including indirect costs for administration and monitoring of the agreement and total costs of the agreement including principal and interest.

The executive director shall establish design standards and specifications which shall be met by any facility which is to be occupied pursuant to this subsection (2).

Any proposal which meets such design standards and specifications and which has been approved by the capital development committee shall be specifically authorized, prior to its execution, by a separate bill enacted by the general assembly. Subsequent to such authorization by the general assembly in such manner, payments by the state may be made from moneys appropriated by the general assembly without the necessity of a separate bill.

Payments under such agreements shall be included in the capital construction fund, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and shall be certified, audited, and paid in the same manner as all other accounts and expenditures are paid out of such funds appropriated to the capital construction fund. Such obligations shall not create an indebtedness of the state within the meaning of any provisions of the state constitution or laws of the state concerning or limiting the creation of indebtedness of the state.

Each agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection (2) may contain such terms, provisions, and conditions as the executive director deems appropriate, including provisions by which the state may receive fee title to the real and personal property which is the subject of each agreement on or prior to the expiration of the terms thereof, including all optional terms.

Property acquired or occupied pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be exempt from taxation so long as it is used for a public purpose connected with any authorized work or programs of the department.

Subject to annual appropriations by the general assembly, agreements entered into pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be enforceable in any court of competent jurisdiction in the state.

The entity with which the department enters into an agreement pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall submit a detailed plan for the department of corrections to assume responsibility for a correctional facility when the contract between the state and the entity terminates. The state, through the executive director of the department of corrections, may terminate the agreement for cause after written notice of material deficiencies and after sixty workdays have been provided to the entity to correct the material deficiencies. If any event occurs involving the noncompliance with or violation of contract terms and presents a serious threat to the safety, health, or security of the inmates, employees, or the public, the department of corrections may temporarily assume responsibility for the correctional facility. In addition, the entity shall submit a plan for the temporary assumption of operations of a correctional facility by the department of corrections in the event of bankruptcy or the financial insolvency of the entity. The entity shall provide an emergency plan to address inmate disturbances, employee work stoppages, strikes, or other serious events. The plan shall comply with applicable national correctional standards. The state may assume responsibility for the operation of a facility upon approval by the general assembly through the enactment of legislation.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 905, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(b) repealed, pp. 685, 705, §§ 23, 88, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1360, § 12, effective June 28.

L. 86:

(1)(d) added, p. 751, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 88:

(2) added, p. 699, § 1, effective May 17; (1)(e) added, p. 677, § 2, effective July 1; (1)(e) and (1)(f) added, p. 710, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(c) amended, p. 53, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1.5) added, p. 563, § 4, effective April 6.

L. 95:

(3) added, p. 1271, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 96:

(1)(f) amended, p. 1149, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(g) to (1)(i) added, p. 27, § 2, effective March 20.

L. 2000:

(1)(a), (1)(c), and (1)(g) amended, p. 834, § 9, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-1-105 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-1-105.1. Accreditation of private contract prisons.

Repealed.

Prior to submitting building plans to any county, municipality, city and county, or other local governmental agency, any company proposing to construct a private prison within the state shall conduct at least one hearing in the county where the facility is proposed to be constructed for public input following at least twenty days' notice published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the private prison is to be located.

A private prison shall not contract to house any inmate, except on a temporary basis, unless within two years of the date that it accepts its first inmate it holds a current accreditation by the American correctional association.

The executive director may extend the time period for a private prison to obtain the accreditation required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) upon a showing of good cause.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1236, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2000:

(1) repealed, p. 835, § 10, effective May 24.

17-1-105.5. Contract rates.

Contracts for the confinement and maintenance of state inmates in private contract facilities or facilities operated by a political subdivision of the state entered into pursuant to this article shall be at rates that are negotiated by the department; except that the rate shall not exceed the maximum rate that is provided in the annual general appropriation bill.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1149, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 375, § 1, effective April 10.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(d) provided for the repeal of subsection (2), effective June 30, 2009. (See L. 2008, p. 375.)

17-1-106. Transfer of functions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 905, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 835, § 11, effective May 24.

17-1-107. Department may accept gifts, donations, and grants.

The department may accept, or refuse to accept, on behalf of and in the name of the state, gifts, donations, and grants, including grants of federal funds, for any purpose connected with the work or programs of the department. The executive director, with the approval of the governor, shall have the power to direct the disposition of any such gift, donation, or grant so accepted for any purpose consistent with the terms and conditions under which given.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 906, § 10, effective August 1.

17-1-107.5. State criminal alien assistance program cash fund - creation.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the state criminal alien assistance program cash fund. The fund shall consist of moneys received by the state under the federal state criminal alien assistance program of the federal "Immigration and Nationality Act", 8 U.S.C. sec. 1231 (i). All such moneys shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the fund. The moneys in the fund shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly to the department of corrections for the 2004-05 state fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter for the purposes of defraying the costs of incarcerating undocumented criminal aliens sentenced to a term of imprisonment with the department. All investment earnings derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred or credited to the general fund or another fund.

For the purpose of maximizing revenues in the state criminal alien assistance program cash fund, the governor shall, in connection with an annual request for compensation to the state for incarcerating undocumented criminal aliens pursuant to the federal "Immigration and Nationality Act", 8 U.S.C. sec. 1231 (i), submit to the United States attorney general the average per-inmate cost and the total cost of incarcerating such undocumented criminal aliens for the state fiscal year for which the request is made.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 726, § 1, effective June 1.

17-1-108. Transfer of inmates.

A person committed to the care and custody of the department as an inmate who is transferred to another institution, agency, or person for care and keeping, or who is transferred from a jail to the department, shall be transferred with medical records and any other record necessary and relevant to the nature and length of the transfer. Such records shall be provided to the person or agency who will receive the inmate, and the receiving person or agency shall acknowledge receipt of the records and approve of the transfer.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 603, § 4, effective July 1, 1994.)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 906, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 686, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 828, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 603, § 4, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1650, § 94, effective May 31.

Cross references:

For transfer of inmates with behavioral or mental health disorders or intellectual and developmental disabilities, see article 23 of this title 17.

17-1-109. Duties and functions of the warden.

The warden of each correctional facility shall exercise the powers and perform the duties and functions assigned to the warden by this article under the supervision and control of the executive director or the executive director's designee.

The warden of each correctional facility should, wherever possible, take such measures as are reasonably necessary to restrict the confinement of any person who actively participates in disruptive security-threat group behavior, as defined in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), so as to prevent contact with other inmates at such facility. The warden should, wherever possible, also take such measures as are reasonably necessary to prevent recruitment of new security-threat group members from among the general inmate population. Association with an inmate gang or security-threat group alone shall not be sufficient to meet the requirements of this paragraph (a).

For the purposes of this subsection (2), unless the context otherwise requires, "security-threat group" means a group of three or more individuals acting in concert or individually in an activity that is characterized by criminal conduct or conduct that violates the department's code of penal discipline for the purpose of disrupting prison operations, recruiting new members, damaging property, or inflicting or threatening to inflict harm to employees, contract workers, volunteers, or other state inmates.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 906, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 686, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 872, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 29, § 7, effective March 20.

L. 2000:

(1) and (2)(a) amended, p. 835, § 12, effective May 24.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (SB 11-176), ch. 289, p. 1342, § 2, effective July 1.

17-1-109.5. Correctional facility employees - rules.

On and after April 1, 2004, the department shall not hire a person who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the provisions of the "Colorado Sex Offender Registration Act", article 22 of title 16, C.R.S., to work at a correctional facility.

The department shall ensure that any person who is employed to work at a correctional facility as of April 1, 2004, and who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the provisions of the "Colorado Sex Offender Registration Act", article 22 of title 16, C.R.S., does not have unsupervised contact with an inmate on and after April 1, 2004.

If a person, while employed by the department, is convicted of an offense that requires the employee to register as a sex offender pursuant to the provisions of the "Colorado Sex Offender Registration Act", article 22 of title 16, C.R.S., the employee shall immediately notify the department of the conviction and the registration requirement. The department shall ensure that the employee does not have unsupervised contact with an inmate on and after the date it receives notice pursuant to this subsection (3).

The executive director shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to ensure compliance with the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 230, § 1, effective April 1.

17-1-110. Joint review committee on corrections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 78:

Entire section added, p. 124, § 2, effective April 18.

Editor's note:

When this section was enacted in 1978, the general assembly provided for the repeal of this section upon occupancy of the maximum security facility. Because the facility has been occupied since December 24, 1980, the repeal date for this section is also December 24, 1980.

17-1-111. Certain provisions of the administrative procedure act not to apply.

The provisions of this title relating to the placement, assignment, management, discipline, and classification of inmates shall not be subject to section 24-4-103, 24-4-105, or 24-4-106, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 687, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 954, § 22, effective June 7.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 836, § 13, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1197, § 49, effective August 4.

17-1-112. Expenses - reimbursement by department - report.

Subject to available appropriations, the department shall reimburse any county or city and county for a portion of the expenses and costs incurred by that county or city and county in the confinement and maintenance in a local jail of any person who is sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a correctional facility. The general assembly shall annually establish the amount of reimbursement in the general appropriations bill, taking into consideration the information reported pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. Such reimbursement is for each day following seventy-two hours after such sentence is imposed but prior to the transmittal of the sentenced inmate to a department facility. Subject to available appropriations, the department may contract with any county or city and county for the expenses incurred by that county or city and county in the confinement and maintenance of any person who is sentenced to a term of imprisonment pursuant to section 16-11-308.5.

(1.5) In no event shall any agreement to reimburse any city and county or county affect or reduce any city and county's or county's duty to exercise reasonable care and use its best efforts to supervise and use reasonable precautions to assure the adequate care of any state inmate.

(1.7) On or after April 19, 1993, each city and county or county shall send an invoice to the executive director within three months after the expenses and costs for the confinement and maintenance of inmates in local jails are incurred; however, each city and county or county is encouraged to send such invoice on a monthly basis, when possible. Failure by a city and county or county to send an invoice to the executive director within three months after such expenses and costs are incurred shall result in a forfeiture of any reimbursement by the state for such expenses and costs.

Any moneys to which a county or city and county may be entitled pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be paid to the treasurer of the county or the manager of revenue of the city and county, who shall credit the same to the general fund of the county or city and county or such other fund as the board of county commissioners of the county or the city council of the city and county may direct and who shall account for such moneys as provided by law.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 88, p. 710, § 9, effective July 1, 1988.)

To assist the general assembly in determining the amount of reimbursement described in subsection (1) of this section, on or before January 1, 2019, and on or before January 1 each year thereafter, each county and each city and county shall report to the joint budget committee the average cost of confining and maintaining persons in a local jail for more than seventy-two hours after each such person has been sentenced to the custody of the department. On or before September 1, 2018, the joint budget committee shall establish guidelines to ensure that each county and each city and county reports costs pursuant to this subsection (4) in a uniform manner. At a minimum, the guidelines must allow each county and each city and county to report costs in the following categories:

Food;

Clothing and laundry;

Medical and behavioral health-care costs;

Personnel costs, including salaries and benefits;

Inmate transportation costs;

Vocational training and educational costs; and

Menstrual hygiene products, as defined by section 17-1-113.6 (2).

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1339, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 710, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1.5) added, p. 879, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(1) amended, p. 20, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) and (1.5) amended, p. 337, § 2, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(1) and (1.5) amended and (1.7) added, p. 405, § 2, effective April 19.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 880, § 17, effective May 24.

L. 2000:

(1), (1.5), and (1.7) amended, p. 836, § 14, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

(1) amended and (4) added, (HB 18-1132), ch. 163, p. 1129, § 1, effective April 25.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1224), ch. 131, p. 588, § 2, effective April 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1224, see section 1 of chapter 131, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

17-1-112.5. Annual audit by state auditor. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 338, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 93:

Entire section repealed, p. 406, § 3, effective April 19.

17-1-113. Medical visits - charge to inmates - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that the procedures for charging inmates a copayment for medical services are confusing to department personnel and, as a result, are inconsistently applied.

The general assembly therefore finds and determines that the department should establish clear and consistent written procedures concerning copayments for medical, dental, mental health, and optometric services rendered to or on behalf of inmates and should require the facilities rendering the services to comply with the procedures, including the maintenance of detailed records regarding the assessment of copayments.

The department shall assess a copayment, in an amount established by written procedures of the executive director pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, not to exceed five dollars per visit, against an inmate's account for every inmate-initiated request for medical or mental health services provided to the inmate by a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse. The department shall assess a copayment, in an amount established by written procedures of the executive director pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, against an inmate's account for every inmate-initiated visit by the inmate to a dentist or optometrist. The amount of the copayment for the dental or optometric services need not be the same as the copayment for medical or mental health services.

The department shall communicate the copayment procedures to every correctional facility that provides medical, dental, mental health, and optometric services to or on behalf of inmates to ensure that all department personnel consistently and regularly assess the required copayment.

The executive director shall establish written procedures relating to medical, dental, mental health, and optometric service copayments, which procedures shall address, but need not be limited to, the following:

The amount of the copayment to be assessed against an inmate's account for inmate-initiated medical services, including but not limited to mental health services, which copayment shall not exceed the direct and indirect costs associated with any type of medical or mental health service that may be rendered;

The amount of the copayment to be assessed against an inmate's account for inmate-initiated dental and optometric services, which copayment shall not exceed the direct and indirect costs associated with any dental or optometric service that may be rendered;

The detailed procedures that department personnel are to follow in assessing the copayments;

The specific services for which a copayment will be assessed, waived, or reduced, as well as the specific and exclusive bases upon which a copayment may be waived by department personnel, including but not limited to the inmate's inability to pay the copayment, the health needs of the inmate, and the public health and safety needs of the institution;

The information to be obtained by department personnel at the time of the inmate's medical, dental, mental health, or optometric visit on a standardized department form, including the inmate's name, the inmate's identification number, the amount of the copayment assessed, if any, the reason for the visit, the type of service rendered, and the basis for any waiver of the copayment; and

The appropriate action that will be taken, consistent with state personnel rules, against department personnel who fail to comply with the copayment procedures.

The department shall monitor the information collected pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection (4) of this section to ensure that the copayment procedures are being applied consistently to all inmates.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 649, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 880, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 202, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2000:

(6) repealed, p. 836, § 15, effective May 24; (6) repealed, p. 1545, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 294, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-158), ch. 204, p. 727, § 15, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 16-158, see section 1 of chapter 204, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

17-1-113.1. Administration or monitoring of medications to persons in correctional facilities.

The executive director has the power to direct the administration or monitoring of medications to persons in correctional facilities, as described in section 25-1.5-301 (2)(a), C.R.S., under the executive director's control, in a manner consistent with part 3 of article 1.5 of title 25, C.R.S.

The executive director may authorize the transfer, delivery, or distribution to a corporation, individual, or other entity, other than a consumer, entitled to possess prescription drugs in an amount that is less than, equal to, or in excess of five percent of the total number of dosage units or drugs dispensed and distributed on an annual basis.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 1149, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 837, § 16, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 704, § 24, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 957, § 17, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 03-002 and Senate Bill 03-119 were harmonized.

17-1-113.2. Continuity of care for persons released from correctional facility.

Before a person is released from the custody of a correctional facility, the correctional facility shall comply with the provisions of section 17-26-140 concerning continuity of care for persons with a substance use disorder.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1017), ch. 288, p. 1425, § 7, effective September 14.

17-1-113.3. Telemedicine - study - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1553, § 1, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2007. (See L. 2006, p. 1553.)

17-1-113.4. Opioid treatment for a person in custody - definitions.

A correctional facility or private contract prison may make available opioid agonists and opioid antagonists to a person in custody with an opioid use disorder. The correctional facility or private contract prison is strongly encouraged to maintain the treatment of the person throughout the duration of the person's incarceration, as medically necessary.

Qualified medication administration personnel may, in accordance with a written physician's order, administer opioid agonists and opioid antagonists for the treatment of an opioid use disorder pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

As funding and supplies allow, if a person in custody is treated for an opioid use disorder pursuant to this section, the correctional facility or private contract prison shall offer the person, upon release from the facility, at least two doses of an opioid reversal medication, in a form approved by the federal drug administration, and provide education to the person about the appropriate use of the medication.

A correctional facility or private contract prison may contract with community-based health providers for the implementation of this section.

(3.5) Nothing in this section imposes civil or criminal liability on a state law enforcement agency or law enforcement officer when ordinary care is used in the administration or provision of an opioid reversal medication in cases when an individual appears to be experiencing an opioid overdose.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Opioid agonist" means a full or partial agonist that is approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of an opioid use disorder.

"Opioid antagonist" means naltrexone, an opioid reversal medication, or any similarly acting drug used for the treatment of an opioid use disorder that is not a controlled substance and that is approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of an opioid use disorder.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1017), ch. 288, p. 1422, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(2) and (4)(b) amended and (3.5) added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2382, § 28, effective June 28.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

17-1-113.5. Inmates held in correctional facilities - medical benefits application assistance - county of residence - rules.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), on and after January 1, 2003, any person who is sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a correctional facility who was receiving medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-5-101 (1)(f) or 25.5-5-201 (1)(j), C.R.S., immediately prior to entering the correctional facility, or who is reasonably expected to meet eligibility criteria pursuant to section 25.5-5-101 (1)(f) or 25.5-5-201 (1)(j), C.R.S., upon release, shall receive assistance from correctional facility personnel in applying for such medical assistance at least ninety days prior to release.

On and after January 1, 2003, any person who is sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a correctional facility who was eligible for supplemental security income benefits under Title II of the federal "Social Security Act" immediately prior to entering the correctional facility, or who is reasonably expected to meet eligibility criteria for supplemental security income benefits upon release, shall receive assistance from the correctional facility personnel in applying for such supplemental security income benefits at least ninety days prior to release or sooner, if possible.

The department shall ensure that any inmate who is sixty-five years of age or older and is being released from prison is enrolled in the most appropriate medical insurance benefit plan including medicare, medicare savings plan, veteran's benefit, or other safety-net health insurance, or an individual health benefit plan prior to release or upon release, whichever will offer the more immediate health-care coverage. If an inmate who is sixty-five years of age or older is not enrolled in a medical insurance benefit plan prior to release and would be unable to pay for costs associated with enrollment in health insurance or would not otherwise be covered under a spouse's individual or employer offered insurance plan, the department shall pay any insurance premiums, penalties, or other costs related to enrollment in health insurance for up to six months from the start of coverage. The department may provide financial assistance for longer than six months if the person is still under the jurisdiction of the department and who would otherwise be uninsured or underinsured without that financial assistance.

The department shall ensure that an inmate who is eligible for premium-free medicare coverage is enrolled during the inmate's initial open enrollment period or during regular open enrollment.

The department of health care policy and financing shall provide information and training on medical assistance eligibility requirements and assistance to each correctional facility to assist in and expedite the application process for medical assistance for any inmate held in custody who meets the requirements of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section.

The department of human services shall provide information and education regarding the supplemental security income systems and processes to each correctional facility.

For purposes of determining eligibility pursuant to section 25.5-4-205, C.R.S., the county of residence of the inmate held in custody shall be the county specified by the inmate as his or her county of residence upon release.

The department of health care policy and financing shall promulgate rules to simplify the processing of applications for medical assistance pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section and to allow inmates determined to be eligible for such medical assistance to access the medical assistance upon release and thereafter. If a county department of human or social services determines that an inmate is eligible for medical assistance, the county shall enroll the inmate in medicaid effective upon release of the inmate. At the time of the inmate's release, the correctional facility shall give the inmate information and paperwork necessary for the inmate to access medical assistance. The applicable county department of human or social services shall provide such information.

The department of corrections shall attempt to enter into prerelease agreements with local social security administration offices, and, if appropriate, the county departments of human or social services, the state department of human services, or the department of health care policy and financing to simplify the processing of applications for medicaid or for supplemental security income to enroll inmates who are eligible for medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-5-101 (1)(f) or 25.5-5-201 (1)(j), effective upon release and to provide such inmates with the information and paperwork necessary to access medical assistance immediately upon release.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1991, § 1, effective June 1, 2007.)

If an inmate is released from confinement but still under criminal justice supervision and is eligible for medical benefits pursuant to the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", articles 4 to 6 of title 25.5, the supervising criminal justice agency shall not place any restriction or make additional requirements a precondition that in any way inhibits the inmate from being able to choose a provider or receive medical care, behavioral health treatment, or any other assistance authorized under the medical benefits.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 805, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) and (4)(c) amended, p. 415, § 4, effective March 5.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) and (4)(c) amended, p. 4, § 7, effective January 1; (5) amended, p. 250, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a), (4)(a), and (4)(c) amended, p. 2004, § 57, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2), (3), (4)(b), (4)(c), and (5) amended, p. 1991, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2018:

(4)(b) and (4)(c) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 404, § 22, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1)(c), (1)(d), and (6) added, (SB 21-146), ch. 459, p. 3084, § 7 , effective July 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

17-1-113.6. Menstrual hygiene products for a person in custody - definition.

A correctional facility or private contract prison shall provide whichever menstrual hygiene products are requested by a person in custody to the person in custody at no expense to the person in custody. A correctional facility or private contract prison shall not impose any condition or restriction on a person in custody's access to menstrual hygiene products.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "menstrual hygiene products" means tampons, menstrual pads, sanitary napkins, and pantiliners.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1224), ch. 131, p. 588, § 3, effective April 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1224, see section 1 of chapter 131, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.